District of Columbia statutes.
22-3224

Fraudulent registration.

(a)

A person commits the offense of fraudulent registration if, with intent to defraud the proprietor or manager of a hotel, motel, or other establishment which provides lodging to transient guests, that person falsely registers under a name or address other than his or her actual name or address.

(b)

Any person convicted of fraudulent registration shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 124, 29 DCR 3976
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(k), 60 DCR 2064
Rights and liabilities of hotel and lodging housekeepers, see §§ 30-101 to 30-103.
1981 Ed., § 22-3824.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $300” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(k) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.